New York, session 2025-2026, A9456.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 163-e of the state finance law, as added by a chap- 2 ter of the laws of 2025 amending the state finance law and the general 3 municipal law relating to prohibiting procurement of certain technology 4 that poses security threats, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5 3259 and A. 2237, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 163-e. Restriction on purchasing certain technology which poses a 7 security threat. 1. (a) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of 8 law, the state and any department, bureau, board, commission, authority, 9 and any other agency or instrumentality of the state shall not enter 10 into or renew any contract or agreement to procure [information and 11 communications] technology, including hardware, systems, devices, soft- 12 ware, or services that include embedded or incidental information tech- 13 nology, which are prohibited from federal procurement pursuant to 14 section 889 of Public Law 115-232 of 2018. 15 (b) The term ["information and communications technology" means: 16 (i) information technology, as defined in section 11101 of title 40; 17 (ii) information systems, as defined in 44 U.S.C. 3502; and 18 (iii) telecommunications equipment and telecommunications services, as 19 those terms are defined in section 3 of the Communications Act of 1934 20 (47 U.S.C. 153). 21 (c) The term "information and communications technology" shall not 22 include automated-decision making systems] "technology" shall have the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01015-02-6 A. 9456 2 1 same meaning as such term is defined in subdivision ten of section one 2 hundred sixty of this article. 3 2. The [chief information officer] office of information technology 4 services shall, in consultation with the division of homeland security 5 and emergency services and the office of general services, establish and 6 update regularly a list of restricted [information and communications] 7 technology. Technology on this list shall not be procured by any state 8 agency, state or local authority, or political subdivision unless a 9 waiver is issued pursuant to subdivision three of this section or the 10 [chief information officer] office of information technology services 11 determines that the technology shall only be restricted in limited 12 circumstances. 13 The list shall: 14 (a) contain [information and communications] technologies that pose a 15 security risk to the state of New York or its political subdivisions. In 16 determining whether [information and communications] technology poses 17 such a risk, the [chief information officer] office of information tech- 18 nology services shall consult relevant federal sources, including the 19 department of defense inspector general report no. DODIG-2019-106, as 20 well as any other source that shall be determined to be relevant; and 21 (b) [describe the scope of each restriction, such as whether it is 22 generally prohibited or prohibited in certain circumstances or from 23 certain entities; 24 (c) include an explanation as to why items were included on the list; 25 and 26 (d)] be published online and communicated to all relevant procurement 27 officers in all state agencies, state authorities, and political subdi- 28 visions. 29 3. The [commissioner] office of information technology services, in 30 collaboration with the division of homeland security and emergency 31 services, the [commissioner of the] office of general services, the 32 [adjutant general, the chief information officer] division of military 33 and naval affairs, and the chief cyber officer, [the chief technology 34 officer of the city of New York and any federal agency authorized under 35 section 889 of Public Law 115-232 of 2018,] may provide a waiver from 36 this section if: 37 (a) any such entity determines the waiver is in the interests of the 38 state or political subdivision; 39 (b) no compliant product or service is available to be procured as, 40 and when, needed at United States market prices or a price that is not 41 considered prohibitively expensive; and 42 (c) such waiver could not reasonably be expected to compromise the 43 security or integrity of a computer network operated by an instrumental- 44 ity of the state. 45 (d) Any state agency, state or local authority, or political subdivi- 46 sion seeking a waiver from any federal agency authorized under section 47 889 of Public Law 115-232 of 2018 must provide notice of any such waiver 48 granted to the office of information technology services within thirty 49 days of waiver approval. 50 4. An unmanned aerial vehicle or other equipment or service relating 51 to the operation of an unmanned aerial vehicle from a business or entity 52 that would otherwise be subject to restriction under subdivision one or 53 two of this section must be exempt from such restriction if: 54 (a) any photograph, image, recording or other information collected by 55 the state agency, state or local authority, or political subdivision A. 9456 3 1 from the operation of the unmanned aerial vehicle or other equipment or 2 service relating to the operation of the unmanned aerial vehicle: 3 (i) is stored and maintained exclusively within the United States; and 4 (ii) is not accessible to the business or entity that would otherwise 5 be subject to restriction; or 6 (iii) is operated using software developed and maintained in the 7 United States. 8 (b) the provisions of this subdivision shall not be construed to 9 discourage the purchase or acquisition of any unmanned aerial vehicle or 10 other equipment or service relating to the operation of an unmanned 11 aerial vehicle that is manufactured in the United States. 12 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed: 13 (a) to require any [information and communications] technology resi- 14 dent in equipment, systems, or services as of the day before the effec- 15 tive date of this section to be removed or replaced; 16 (b) to prohibit or limit the utilization of such [information and 17 communications] technology throughout the lifecycle of such existing 18 equipment; or 19 (c) to require the recipient of a state contract, grant, loan, or loan 20 guarantee to replace [information and communications] technology resi- 21 dent in equipment, systems, or services before the effective date of 22 this section. 23 § 2. Section 103-h of the general municipal law, as added by a chapter 24 of the laws of 2025 amending the state finance law and the general 25 municipal law relating to prohibiting procurement of certain technology 26 that poses security threats, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 27 3259 and A. 2237, is amended to read as follows: 28 § 103-h. Restriction on purchasing certain technology which poses a 29 security threat. 1. (a) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of 30 law a political subdivision shall not enter into or renew any contract 31 or agreement to procure [information and communications] technology, 32 including hardware, systems, devices, software, or services that include 33 embedded or incidental information technology, which are prohibited from 34 federal procurement pursuant to section 889 of Public Law 115-232 of 35 2018, or which are included on the list created pursuant to subdivision 36 two of section one hundred sixty-three-e of the state finance law. 37 (b) The term ["information and communications technology" means: 38 (i) information technology, as defined in 40 U.S.C. 11101; 39 (ii) information systems, as defined in 44 U.S.C. 3502; and 40 (iii) telecommunications equipment and telecommunications services, as 41 those terms are defined in section 3 of the Communications Act of 1934 42 (47 U.S.C. 153)] "technology" shall have the same meaning as such term 43 is defined in subdivision ten of section one hundred sixty of the state 44 finance law. 45 2. The [commissioner] office of information technology services, in 46 collaboration with the division of homeland security and emergency 47 services, the [commissioner of the] office of general services, the 48 [adjutant general, the chief information officer] division of military 49 and naval affairs, and the chief cyber officer, [the chief technology 50 officer of the city of New York and any federal agency authorized under 51 section 889 of Public Law 115-232 of 2018,] may provide a waiver from 52 this section if: 53 (a) any such entity determines the waiver is in the interest of the 54 political subdivision; A. 9456 4 1 (b) no compliant product or service is available to be procured as, 2 and when, needed at United States market prices or a price that is not 3 considered prohibitively expensive; and 4 (c) such waiver could not reasonably be expected to compromise the 5 security or integrity of a computer network operated by an instrumental- 6 ity of the state. 7 [4.] (d) Any political subdivision seeking a waiver from any federal 8 agency authorized under section 889 of Public Law 115-232 of 2018 must 9 provide notice of any such waiver granted to the office of information 10 technology services within thirty days of waiver approval. 11 3. Nothing in this section shall be construed: 12 (a) to require any [information and communications] technology resi- 13 dent in equipment, systems, or services as of the day before the effec- 14 tive date of this section to be removed or replaced; 15 (b) to prohibit or limit the utilization of such [information and 16 communications] technology throughout the lifecycle of such existing 17 equipment; or 18 (c) to require the recipient of a state contract, grant, loan, or loan 19 guarantee to replace [information and communications] technology resi- 20 dent in equipment, systems, or services before the effective date of 21 this section. 22 § 3. Section 3 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the state 23 finance law and the general municipal law relating to prohibiting 24 procurement of certain technology that poses security threats, as 25 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3259 and A. 2237, is amended to 26 read as follows: 27 § 3. No later than the effective date of this act, the office of 28 [general services] information technology services shall [promulgate 29 rules and regulations and] issue guidance to all state agencies and 30 local procurement authorities necessary, including providing updates 31 on prohibited or excluded entities for procurement contracts in 32 conformity with federal law, rules and regulations, no later than sixty 33 days after any entity is prohibited or excluded. 34 § 4. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the state 35 finance law and the general municipal law relating to prohibiting 36 procurement of certain technology that poses security threats, as 37 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3259 and A. 2237, is amended to 38 read as follows: 39 § 4. This act shall take effect two years after it shall have become a 40 law. Effective immediately, the office of [general services] information 41 technology services is authorized to [promulgate rules and regulations 42 and] issue guidance to all state agencies and local procurement authori- 43 ties necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date, 44 including providing updates on prohibited or excluded entities for 45 procurement contracts in conformity with federal law, rules and regu- 46 lations. 47 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 48 sections one, two and three of this act shall take effect on the same 49 date and in the same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending 50 the state finance law and the general municipal law relating to prohib- 51 iting procurement of certain technology that poses security threats, as 52 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3259 and A. 2237, takes effect.